Washington statutes.
RCW 3.46.015

Operation of municipal department in existence prior to July 1, 2008.

A municipality operating a municipal department under this chapter prior to July 1, 2008, may continue to operate as if chapter 227, Laws of 2008 was not adopted. Such municipal departments shall remain subject to the provisions of this chapter as this chapter was written prior to the adoption of chapter 227, Laws of 2008.

[ 2008 c 227 s 11.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Subheadings not law—2008 c 227: See notes following RCW 3.50.003.